apertium-sme-fin.sme.lexc
LEXICON oblindefcas-miinai
 +Gen:nnai # ;
 +Gen:nnai»# NAMAT ;
 +Acc:nnai # ;
! +Gen:nai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
 +Gen:nai»# NAMAT ;
! +Acc:nai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
 +Ill:sanai # ;
 +Ill:sai # ;
 +Loc:snai # ;
 +Loc:sai # ;
 +Loc:stenai # ;
 +Loc:stai # ;
 +Com:jnnanai # ;
 +Com:jnnai # ;
 +Gen:jdnai # ;
 +Gen:jdnai»# NAMAT ;
 +Acc:jdnai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
! +Gen:jdai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
 +Gen:jdai»# NAMAT ;
! +Acc:jdai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
 +Ill:jddanai # ;
! +Ill:jddai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
 +Loc:jnnai # ;
 +Loc:jnai # ;




! guhtege
LEXICON GUHTEGECASE
 GUHTEGE-NE ;
 GUGE-GUGE-OBL ;


! Nom and Ess of guhtege
LEXICON GUHTEGE-NE
 +Sg+Nom:%>ge # ;
 +Ess:%>nge # ;

! guhtemušge
LEXICON GUHTEMUSGECASE
 GUHTEMUSGE-NE ;
 :a%> GUGE-GUGE-OBL ;

! Nom and Ess of guhtemušge
LEXICON GUHTEMUSGE-NE
 +Sg+Nom:%>ge # ;
 +Ess:a%>nge # ;

! Oblique paradigm for guhtege and guhtemušGE
LEXICON GUGE-GUGE-OBL
 +Sg+Gen:X8ge # ;
 +Sg+Gen:X8ge»# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Acc:X8ge # ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3jge # ;
!+Sg+Gen:ge # ; ! this should go out
 +Sg+Loc:X4sge # ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X4nge K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:X5jnge # ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4tge # ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jdge # ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jdge»# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:X5jdge # ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5jdege # ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:X5jnge # ; ! because of speller
!+Pl+Com:X5jgujnge # ; !ComPl is out.

LEXICON GUHTENAI
 +Sg+Nom:%>nai # ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X8nai # ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X8nai»# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X8nai # ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>X3jnai # ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4snai # ;
 +Sg+Com:%>X5jnnai # ;
 +Ess:%>nnai # ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4tnai # ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X5jdnai # ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X5jdnai»# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>X5jdnai # ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>X5jdenai # ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X5jnnai # ; ! because of speller



! Declineable indefinites with normal case paradigms
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

!splitting v- and c-final evensyll in two for NomEss, as usual.
LEXICON indef-a-even-v
 indefattr ;
 indefdecleven-v-ne ;
 indefdecleven-obl ;

LEXICON indef-a-even-c
 :%> indefattr ;
 :%> indefdecleven-c-ne ;
 :a%> indefdecleven-obl ;

LEXICON indefdecleven-obl
 indefdeclsgeven ;
 indefdeclpleven ;

LEXICON indefdecleven-v-ne
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Ess:n K ;

LEXICON indefdecleven-c-ne
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Ess:an K ;

LEXICON indefdeclsgeven
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4»# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:X5jn K ;

LEXICON indefdeclpleven
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jd9»# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:X5jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:X5jgujn K ;
 
LEXICON nubbicase
 +Attr:0 K ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4X7 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4X7»# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4X7 K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jd9»# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:X5jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:X5jgujn K ;


LEXICON JUOBBAGOABBA
 +Sg+Nom:juobbá%>#goabbá%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:juoppá%>#goappá%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:juoppá%>#goappá»# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Acc:juoppá%>#goappá%> K ;
 +Sg+Ill:juobbá%>i#goabbá%>i K ;
 +Sg+Loc:juoppá%>s#goappá%>s K ;
 +Sg+Com:juoppá%>in#goappá%>in K ;
 +Ess:juobbá%>n#goabbá%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:juobbá%>t#goabbá%>t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:juoppá%>jd9#goappá%>jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:juoppá%>jd9#goappá%>jd9»# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:juoppá%>jd9#goappá%>jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:juobbá%>jde#goabbá%>jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:juoppá%>jn#goappá%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:juoppá%>jgujn#goappá%>jgujn K ;

! Intermediate lexica for uneven indefinite pronouns
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indef-a-uneven
 indefattr ;
 indefdecluneven ;

LEXICON indef-a-uneven-gahpir
 indefattr ;
 indefdecluneven-gahpir ;

LEXICON indefsg-a-uneven
 indefattr ;
 indu-sg ;

LEXICON indefdecluneven
 indu-sg ;
 indu-pl-gahpir ;

LEXICON indu-sg
 :X4 indef-sg-u-n ;
 indef-sg-u-e ;
 :X2 indefdeclsguneven-ag ;
 indefdeclsguneven-ilc ;

LEXICON indefdecluneven-gahpir
 indu-sg-gahpir ;
 indu-pl-gahpir ;

LEXICON indu-sg-gahpir
 indefdeclsguneven-ne ;
 indefdeclsguneven-ag ;
 indefdeclsguneven-ilc ;

LEXICON indu-pl-gahpir
 indefdeclpluneven-n ;
 :i indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
 indef-sg-u-e ; !For eatnagin

! Suffix lexica for uneven indefinite pronouns
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indefdeclsguneven-ne
 indef-sg-u-n ;
 indef-sg-u-e ;

LEXICON indef-sg-u-n
 +Sg+Nom: K ;

LEXICON indef-sg-u-e
 +Ess:in K ;

LEXICON indefdeclsguneven-ag
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;

LEXICON indefdeclsguneven-ilc
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;

LEXICON indefdeclpluneven-n
 +Pl+Nom:at K ;

LEXICON indefdeclpluneven-obl
 +Pl+Gen:jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;

LEXICON indefattr
 +Attr:0 K ;


! Multiword indefinites
! - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indefmulti !SUB added this lexicon, because otherwise these would be in indefattr
 feara% mii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:feara% mij K-son ; ! spellera dihte
 feara% mii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:feara% májd9 K-son ; ! spellera dihte
 feara% gii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:feara% gij K-son ; ! spellera dihte
 feara% mii+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:feara% ma oblintercas ; ! spellera dihte
 feara% gii+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:feara% gea oblintercas ; ! spellera dihte

 vaikko% mii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:vaikko% mij K-son ; ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% mii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:vaikko% májd9 K-son ; ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% gii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:vaikko% gij K-son ; ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% mii+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:vaikko% ma oblintercas ; ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% gii+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:vaikko% gea oblintercas ; ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% makkár+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:vaikko% makkár DAKKAR ;  ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% guh0te+Pron+Interr+Use/Sub:vaikko% guh'te GUHTECASE ;  ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% guhtemuš+Pron+Interr+Use/Sub:vaikko% guđemužž GUHTEMUŠCASE ; ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% goabbá+Pron+Interr+Use/Sub:vaikko% goabbá GUHTECASE ; ! spellera dihte

! some multiword prons, according to Nickel
!feara% mii iind ;
!feara% gii iind ;
 mii% nu+Use/Sub:mii% nu iind;  ! spellera
 gii% nu+Use/Sub:gii% nu iind;  ! spellera
 makkár% nu+Use/Sub:makkár% nu iind;  ! spellera
 makkáraš% nu+Use/Sub:makkáraš% nu iind;  ! spellera


! The indeclineable indefinites
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indeclindef
 ald+Use/Sub:ald9 iind ; !
buot iind ;
buot:buot»# NAMAT ;
gait:gajt iind ;
gait:gajt»# NAMAT ;
eatnat iind ;
eatnat:eatnat»# NAMAT ;
!fal iind ; ! cf. Nickel s. 126.
gallát iind ;
goabbat iind ;
goabbat:goabbat»# NAMAT ;
goappaš iind ;
goappaš:goappaš»# NAMAT ;
!goappašat iind ; ! thus both Nom and non-Nom. XXX.
guhtet iind ;
ieš#guhtet iind ;
ieš#guđet iind ;
ieš#guđet:ieš#guđet»# NAMAT ;
ieš#guhtet:ieš#guhtet»# NAMAT ;
ihkinassii iind ;
juohke iind ;
juohke:juohke»# NAMAT ;
ollu iind ;
olu iind ;
!vaikko iind ; !This is CS, not pron


LEXICON iind
 +Pron+Indef:%>0 K ;



! Separate lexica for exceptional entries
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON declindef
eará+Pron+Indef:eará%>               indef-a-even-v ;
iežá+Pron+Indef:iežá%>                   indef-a-even-v ;
uhccánaš+Pron+Indef:uhccánažž       indef-a-even-c ;
unnánaš+Pron+Indef:unnánažž           indef-a-even-c ;
ea0nas+Pron+Indef:eatnas%>           indef-a-uneven ;
ea0naš+Pron+Indef:eatnaš%>               indef-a-uneven ;
muhtin+Pron+Indef:muhtim%>           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
muhtun+Pron+Indef:muhtum%>           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
 muhtun+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:muhtom%>           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ; !
uhccán+Pron+Indef:uhccán%>       indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
unnán+Pron+Indef:unnán%>           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
veháš+Pron+Indef:veháž%>           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
váháš+Pron+Indef:váháž%>           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
veaháš+Pron+Indef:veaháž%>           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
soa0mes+Pron+Indef:soapmás%>          indefattr ;
soa0mes+Pron+Indef:soapmás%>X2      indefdeclsguneven-ag ;
soa0mes+Pron+Indef:soapmás%>          indefdeclsguneven-ilc ;
soa0mes+Pron+Indef:soapmás%>X2      indefdeclpluneven-n ;
soa0mes+Pron+Indef:soapmás%>i          indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
nuppát+Pron+Indef:nuppád%>              indefsg-a-uneven ;
duobbá+Pron+Indef:duobbá%>              indef-a-even-v ;
dábbá+Pron+Indef:dábbá%>              indef-a-even-v ;
juobbá+Pron+Indef:juobbá%>              indef-a-even-v ;
juobbá#goabbá+Pron+Indef: JUOBBAGOABBA ;
nubbi+Pron+Indef:nubbi%>             nubbicase ;
nubbi+Pron+Recipr:nubbi%>             nubbicase ;
juohkehaš+Pron+Indef:juohkehažž         indef-a-even-c ;
ollut+Pron+Indef:ollu%>           indefdeclpleven ;
olut+Pron+Indef:olu%>           indefdeclpleven ;
moanat+Pron+Indef:moana%>           indefdeclpleven ;
buohkat+Pron+Indef:buohka%>       indefdeclpleven ;
gait#divnnat+Pron+Indef:gait#divnna%> indefdeclpleven ;
gait#diinnat+Pron+Indef:gait#dijnna%> indefdeclpleven ;
gait#tiinnat+Pron+Indef:gait#tijnna%> indefdeclpleven ;
gaikkat+Pron+Indef:gajkka%>       indefdeclpleven ;
goappašagat+Pron+Indef:goappašaga%>  indefdeclpleven ;
ollugat+Pron+Indef:ollug%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
oallugat+Pron+Indef:oallug%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
olugat+Pron+Indef:olug%>           indu-pl-gahpir ;
gal0lis+Pron+Indef:gal'lis%>       indefdecluneven ;
olus+Pron+Indef:olus%>           indefdecluneven ;
 ol0lus+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:ol'lus%>           indefdecluneven ; ! substandard
soamis+Pron+Indef:soamis%>       indefdecluneven ;
eambbosat+Pron+Indef:eambbos%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
eambbogat+Pron+Indef:eambbog%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
guoktásat+Pron+Indef:guoktás%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
goappašat+Pron+Indef:goappaš%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
goappešat+Pron+Indef:goappeš%>        indu-pl-gahpir ;
eanebut+Pron+Indef:eaneb%>u       indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
eanemusat+Pron+Indef:eanemus%>X2       indefdeclpluneven-n ;
eanemusat+Pron+Indef:eanemus%>iX2       indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
eanebat+Pron+Indef:eaneb%>i       indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
eatnagat+Pron+Indef:eatnag%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
galládat+Pron+Indef:gallád%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
